Massachusetts, session 194th, S2367.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 32C of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof 
the following paragraph:- 
No person engaged in the business of leasing motor vehicles or trailers under the ''drive-
it-yourself'' system, so called, wherein the amount of the rental is determinable in whole or in 
part by the distance such motor vehicles or trailers travel or any similar system including rentals 
based on daily, weekly, hourly or monthly rental rates, shall lease any such vehicle whereto is 
attached a hubodometer or other mechanical device for the purpose of registering the distance 
that such vehicle travels which does not register such distance with substantial accuracy, nor 
shall any such person, herein and in the following three sections called the lessor, knowingly 
deceive any lessee of any such vehicle under any such system, herein and in the following three 
sections called the lessee, as to the distance which such vehicle has traveled under the lease, or 

of 3 13 make or collect a charge for the use thereof based wholly or in part on such deception, or lease 
any such vehicle for operation on any public way by any person whom he knows or has reason to 
believe to be under the influence of intoxicating liquor or of any drug. No lessor shall lease any 
motor vehicle or trailer until the lessee shows that he or his authorized operator is the holder of a 
duly issued license to operate the type of motor vehicle or trailer which is being leased. Further, 
no lessor is required to verify such license with the Registry of Motor Vehicles or via any other 
electronic services. 
SECTION 2. Section 32E of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is amended by striking the 
title and replacing it with the following title:- 
Section 32E: Leasing motor vehicles on mileage basis; operation of vehicles or use of 
trailers; insurance coverage; vehicles leased on daily, weekly, hourly or monthly rental rate 
SECTION 3. Said section 32E, as so appearing, is further amended by striking the second 
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
Every lessor shall provide and maintain, during such time as he engages in the business 
of leasing motor vehicles under any system referred to in section 32C, a motor vehicle liability 
policy or bond or deposit up to the minimum financial requirements imposed on owners or 
registrants, on a secondary or contingent basis if the lessee or operator does not have a motor 
vehicle liability policy, or other coverage, which, in addition to providing indemnity, protection 
or security for personal injuries, shall, except in the case of vehicles leased for a term of more 
than 30 days, further provide indemnity, protection or security for damage to property as 
required by the provisions of this chapter. If another valid and collectible liability policy or other 

of 3 34 form of financial security satisfies the minimum financial requirements imposed on owners or 
registrants, a lessor’s obligation under the law is satisfied.  
SECTION 4. Section 34M of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word “section 34A”, each time it appears, the following words:- “or 32E”.